Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.146, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsections: NEW SUBSECTION . 28. a. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing additional endorsements for instruction related to all of the following high-need teaching areas in schools providing instruction to students enrolled in prekindergarten through grade twelve: (1) Fine arts. (2) Mathematics. (3) Science. b. The board shall not grant an applicant an endorsement described in paragraph âaâ unless the applicant holds a bachelorâs degree from an accredited college or university. c. This subsection is repealed July 1, 2030. NEW SUBSECTION . 29. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing an additional kindergarten through grade twelve instructional strategist II endorsement that does not require the applicant to possess a masterâs or doctoral degree as a condition of obtaining the endorsement. NEW SUBSECTION . 30. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing an activities administration authorization. The rules must require an applicant for the activities House File 2724, p. 2 administration authorization to hold a baccalaureate degree or higher in any academic field. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2724, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor